Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-530
Act; entitlement not created; availability of funds; effect.

The Childhood Vaccine Act is not intended to create an entitlement to any activities described in the act, and the Department of Health and Human Services may perform the activities described in the act to the extent funds are available.

Laws 1992, LB 431, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 509.